apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="int__prn">       
		 <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="just__prn">       
		 <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->      
    <pardef n="गलत__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
         
    <pardef n="int__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->      

    <pardef n="और__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- SECTION:  Sub-ordinating Conjunctions -->      
    <pardef n="अगर__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   	
	<!-- SECTION:  Adverbial Conjunctions -->      
	<pardef n="क्योंकि__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  



	<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="आठ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>वां</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>वीं</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पहला__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="एक__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="परन्तु"><i>परन्तु</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="और"><i>और</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="अथवा"><i>अथवा</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="तथा"><i>तथा</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="एवं"><i>एवं</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="पर"><i>पर</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="मगर"><i>मगर</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="या"><i>या</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="लेकिन"><i>लेकिन</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="कि"><i>कि</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="िक"><i>िक</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="ताकि"><i>ताकि</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
	<e lm="तक"><i>तक</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="यदि"><i>यदि</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="अगर"><i>अगर</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्योंकि"><i>क्योंकि</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="चूंकि"><i>चूंकि</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="इसलिए"><i>इसलिए</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहे"><i>चाहे</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
	<e lm="शुन्य"><i>शुन्य</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सिफर"><i>सिफर</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="एक"><i>एक</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="दो"><i>दो</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="तीन"><i>तीन</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चार"><i>चार</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छः"><i>छः</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छह"><i>छह</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सात"><i>सात</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="आठ"><i>आठ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="दस"><i>दस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बारह"><i>बारह</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौदह"><i>चौदह</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सोलह"><i>सोलह</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अट्ठारह"><i>अट्ठारह</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बीस"><i>बीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बाईस"><i>बाईस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौबिस"><i>चौबिस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छब्बीस"><i>छब्बीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अट्ठाईस"><i>अट्ठाईस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="तीस"><i>तीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बत्तीस"><i>बत्तीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौंतीस"><i>चौंतीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छ्त्तीस"><i>छ्त्तीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अड़तीस"><i>अड़तीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चालीस"><i>चालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बयालीस"><i>बयालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौवालीस"><i>चौवालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छियालीस"><i>छियालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अड़तालीस"><i>अड़तालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="पचास"><i>पचास</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बावन"><i>बावन</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चउवन"><i>चउवन</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छप्पन"><i>छप्पन</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अट्ठावन"><i>अट्ठावन</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="साठ"><i>साठ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बासठ"><i>बासठ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौंसठ"><i>चौंसठ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छियासठ"><i>छियासठ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अड़सठ"><i>अड़सठ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सत्तर"><i>सत्तर</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बहत्तर"><i>बहत्तर</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौहत्तर"><i>चौहत्तर</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छिहत्तर"><i>छिहत्तर</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अठहत्तर"><i>अठहत्तर</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अस्सी"><i>अस्सी</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बयासी"><i>बयासी</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौरासी"><i>चौरासी</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छियासी"><i>छियासी</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अठासी"><i>अठासी</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="नब्बे"><i>नब्बे</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बानवे"><i>बानवे</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौरानवे"><i>चौरानवे</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छियानवे"><i>छियानवे</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अट्ठानवे"><i>अट्ठानवे</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सौ"><i>सौ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="पहला"><i>पहला</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रथम"><i>प्रथम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="दूसरा"><i>दूसरा</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="द्वितीय"><i>द्वितीय</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="तीसरा"><i>तीसरा</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="तृतीय"><i>तृतीय</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौथा"><i>चौथा</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चतुर्थ"><i>चतुर्थ</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="पंचम"><i>पंचम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छठा"><i>छठा</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="षष्ठ"><i>षष्ठ</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सप्तम"><i>सप्तम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अष्टम"><i>अष्टम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="नवम"><i>नवम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="हजार"><i>हजार</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="करोड़"><i>करोड़</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="जो"><i>जो</i><par n="int__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कहॉं"><i>कहॉं</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कब "><i>कब</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्यों"><i>क्यों</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्या"><i>क्या</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जब"><i>जब</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सब जगह"><i>सब<b/>जगह</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दूर"><i>दूर</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ऊँचा"><i>ऊँचा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रत्येक"><i>प्रत्येक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सदा"><i>सदा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लगातार"><i>लगातार</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उलटा"><i>उलटा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थिरतापूर्वक"><i>स्थिरतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हर"><i>हर</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="इसलिए"><i>इसलिए</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="निर्भयतापूर्वक"><i>निर्भयतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बलपूर्वक"><i>बलपूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्राय"><i>प्राय</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्रोधपूर्वक"><i>क्रोधपूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फिरभी"><i>फिरभी</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्धाधुन्धा"><i>अन्धाधुन्धा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्सुकतापूर्वक"><i>उत्सुकतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुवर्ती"><i>अनुवर्ती</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तथापि"><i>तथापि</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सिर्फ"><i>सिर्फ</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्फष्टतया"><i>स्फष्टतया</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="शानदार"><i>शानदार</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतीयमानतः"><i>प्रतीयमानतः</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तथापि"><i>तथापि</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कल"><i>कल</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्वत्र"><i>सर्वत्र</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="विश्वव्यापी"><i>विश्वव्यापी</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कृतज्ञतापूर्वक"><i>कृतज्ञतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रचुरतापूर्वक्"><i>प्रचुरतापूर्वक्</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="साथ-साथ"><i>साथ-साथ</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कठोरतापूर्वक"><i>कठोरतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रत्यक्ष"><i>प्रत्यक्ष</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रफुल्लतापूर्वक"><i>प्रफुल्लतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आशु"><i>आशु</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सिलिंडर,भर"><i>सिलिंडर,भर</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अव्यवस्थित"><i>अव्यवस्थित</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="निस्सन्देह"><i>निस्सन्देह</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रसन्नतापूर्वक"><i>प्रसन्नतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="शिष्ट"><i>शिष्ट</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हठपूर्वक"><i>हठपूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रत्ययकारितापूर्वक"><i>प्रत्ययकारितापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मुख्यतः"><i>मुख्यतः</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बार-बार"><i>बार-बार</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अत्यधिक"><i>अत्यधिक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अश्लीलतापूर्वक"><i>अश्लीलतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तुरंत"><i>तुरंत</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उससे"><i>उससे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दृढतापूर्वक"><i>दृढतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उल्टा"><i>उल्टा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ज़बर्दस्ती"><i>ज़बर्दस्ती</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
